Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 1. Interstate Compacts

§ 7-3-101.
Legislative findings.

The legislature finds and declares:

The congress of the United States, pursuant to the provisions of section 10 of article I of the constitution of the United States, has granted its consent, by that certain act of June 6, 1934 (Public Law No. 293, H.R. 7353), as amended, that any two (2) or more states may enter into agreements or compacts for cooperative effort and mutual assistance in the prevention of crime and in the enforcement of their respective criminal laws and policies, and for the establishment of any agencies, joint or otherwise, as they may deem desirable, for making effective the agreements or compacts;

There is a practical need and utility for these agreements or compacts, between or among the state of Wyoming and any other states of the United States, and particularly between or among the state of Wyoming and those states adjoining the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 71, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 10-2601; W.S. 1957, § 7-70; W.S. 1977, § 7-3-530; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 168, § 302.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(i), substituted “that certain act of June 6, 1934 (Public Law No. 293, H.R. 7353), as amended” for “that certain act (Public Law No. 293, H.R. 7353) approved June 6, 1934.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1935, ch. 71, § 10, provides: “The legislature hereby finds, determines and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety.”

The federal act referred to in subsection (a)(i) appeared as 18 U.S.C. § 420, which was omitted in 1969. For the present provisions as to the consent of congress to compacts for the prevention of crime, see 4 U.S.C. § 112.

§ 7-3-102.
Appointment of attorney general to represent state on joint commissions.

The governor shall appoint the attorney general as the commissioner who shall represent Wyoming upon any joint commission created by Wyoming and any one (1) or more states for the purpose of negotiating and entering into agreements or compacts for cooperative effort and mutual assistance in the prevention of crime and in the enforcement of the respective criminal laws and policies of Wyoming and any other state and for the establishment of agencies deemed desirable for making effective any agreement or compact.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 71, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 10-2602; W.S. 1957, § 7-71; W.S. 1977, § 7-3-531; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to general duties of the attorney general, see §

9-1-603

.

§ 7-3-103.
Purpose and objects; required ratification.

Any agreement or compact entered into under W.S.

7-3-101

through

7-3-107

shall be designed to suppress crime, to circumvent the activities of criminals and to expedite their apprehension and trial, and to enforce generally the respective criminal laws and policies of Wyoming and any other state entering into the agreement or compact. In order to effectuate those purposes, an agreement or compact may contain specific provisions for the accomplishment of any of the following objects:

The arrest of any person who has fled from any one (1) of the compacting states into another, by any pursuing officer of the compacting state from which the person fled;

The return of any witness deemed essential in the prosecution of any criminal case who has gone or fled into any other compacting state from the compacting state in which his presence is required;

The establishment and maintenance by any two (2) or more compacting states of facilities for the investigation of crime and the discovery of criminals, including crime detection agencies, bureaus of registration and identification, crime laboratories and similar agencies;

The proper supervision of any person who, having been paroled or granted probation in one (1) of the compacting states, has become a resident of any other compacting state;

The written agreement of one (1) or more law enforcement agencies of this state to enter into mutual aid agreements with one (1) or more law enforcement agencies of this state or an adjoining state or the United States as authorized by W.S. 7-3-903(a).

Any agreement or compact entered into pursuant to this section shall conform with the purposes for which the consent of the congress has been granted. Any agreement or compact entered into on behalf of Wyoming and any one (1) or more states shall not be binding upon any of the states, or upon their respective citizens, until the agreement or compact has been ratified and approved by the respective legislatures of the several states entering into the agreement or compact.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 71, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 10-2603; W.S. 1957, § 7-72; W.S. 1977, § 7-3-532; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2003, ch. 53, § 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

§ 7-3-104.
Legal, clerical and stenographic assistance.

When the commissioner of Wyoming is called to enter upon the performance of his duties, as provided under W.S.

7-3-101

through

7-3-107

, he shall be furnished legal, clerical and stenographic assistance as the governor and he deem advisable and necessary.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 71, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 10-2604; W.S. 1957, § 7-73; W.S. 1977, § 7-3-533; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-105.
Commencement of commissioner's duties.

The commissioner for Wyoming shall not commence the performance of his duties, or be authorized to incur any expenses for traveling, or for legal, clerical or stenographic assistance, until the governor of Wyoming is notified by the governor of another state that he has appointed a commissioner to serve upon a joint commission for the purpose of negotiating and entering into any agreement or compact authorized to be made on behalf of Wyoming under W.S.

7-3-101

through

7-3-107

.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 71, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 10-2605; W.S. 1957, § 7-74; W.S. 1977, § 7-3-534; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-106.
Investigations.

The commissioner for Wyoming has full authority to make any investigations of conditions in Wyoming or in any other state which may be necessary in negotiating any agreement or compact authorized by W.S.

7-3-101

through

7-3-107

.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 71, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 10-2606; W.S. 1957, § 7-75; W.S. 1977, § 7-3-535; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-107.
Compensation of commissioner.

The commissioner for Wyoming shall receive no compensation for his services as such, but he and his assistants shall be entitled to receive their traveling and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 71, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 10-2607; W.S. 1957, § 7-76; W.S. 1977, § 7-3-536; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cited

in

Messer v. State, 2006 WY 141, 145 P.3d 457,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(2006).